test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-parra2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Even-syllabla nouns with 4 syllables. Lexicon GÅNÅGIS, CELSIUS, JIHPELIJ, OARJJILIJ, VIESSOMIJ, VUOHTA, VUONAK

Tests:
  Noun - árradis: # GÅNÅGIS
    árradis+N+Sg+Nom: árradis 
    árradis+N+Sg+Gen: árradisá
    árradis+N+Sg+Ill: árradissaj
    árradis+N+Pl+Ill: árradisájda
    árradis+N+Ess: árradissan
    árradis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: árradisásj
    árradis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: árradisátjasj
    árradis+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    árradis+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    árradis+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    árradis+N+Abe: [árradisádak, árradisáda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá

  Noun - vásádus: # GÅNÅGIS
    vásádus+N+Sg+Nom: vásádus
    vásádus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: vásádussam
    vásádus+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vásádussas
    vásádus+N+Sg+Gen: vásádusá
    vásádus+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: vásádusáma
    vásádus+N+Sg+Acc: vásádusáv
    vásádus+N+Sg+Ine: vásádusán 
    vásádus+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: vásádusánihtte
    vásádus+N+Sg+Ill: vásádussaj
    vásádus+N+Sg+Ela: vásádusás
    vásádus+N+Sg+Com: vásádusájn
    vásádus+N+Pl+Nom: vásádusá
    vásádus+N+Pl+Gen: vásádusáj
    vásádus+N+Pl+Acc: vásádusájt
    vásádus+N+Pl+Ine: vásádusájn
    vásádus+N+Pl+Ill: vásádusájda
    vásádus+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: vásádusájdiseda
    vásádus+N+Pl+Ela: vásádusájs
    vásádus+N+Pl+Com: vásádusáj
    vásádus+N+Ess: vásádussan
    vásádus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vásádusásj
    vásádus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: vásádusátjasj
    vásádus+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vásádus+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vásádus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vásádus+N+Abe: [vásádusádak, vásádusáda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá

  Noun - bednagasj: # GÅNÅGIS
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Nom: bednagasj
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: bednagattjam
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: bednagattjas
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Gen: bednagattja
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bednagattjama
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Acc: bednagattjav
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Ine: bednagattjan
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: bednagattjanihtte
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Ill: bednagattjaj
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Ela: bednagattjas
    bednagasj+N+Sg+Com: bednagattjajn
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Nom: bednagattja
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Gen: bednagattjaj
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Acc: bednagattjajt
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Ine: bednagattjajn
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Ill: bednagattjajda
    bednagasj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: bednagattjajdiseda

  Noun - lullilij: # JIHPELIJ
    lullilij+N+Sg+Nom: lullilij
    lullilij+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: lullilahám
    lullilij+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: lullilahás
    lullilij+N+Sg+Acc: lullilaháv
    lullilij+N+Pl+Com: lullilaháj
    lullilij+N+Ess: lullilahán
    lullilij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: lullilahásj
    lullilij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: lullilahátja
    lullilij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: lullilahátjasj
    lullilij+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    lullilij+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    lullilij+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    lullilij+N+Abe: [lullilahádak, lullilaháda] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá

  Noun - ålggolij: # JIHPELIJ
    ålggolij+N+Sg+Nom: ålggolij
    ålggolij+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ålggolahás
    ålggolij+N+Sg+Acc: ålggolaháv
    ålggolij+N+Pl+Com: ålggolaháj
    ålggolij+N+Ess: ålggolahán

  Noun - allilij: # OARJJILIJ
    allilij+N+Sg+Nom: allilij 
    allilij+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: allilihás
    allilij+N+Sg+Ill: alliliháj 

  Noun - dahkamuj: # VIESSOMUJ
    dahkamuj+N+Sg+Nom: dahkamuj 
    dahkamuj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: dahkamuhás
    dahkamuj+N+Sg+Ine: dahkamuhán
    dahkamuj+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: [dahkamuhánam, dahkamuhánim]
    dahkamuj+N+Sg+Ill: dahkamuháj
    dahkamuj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dahkamuhásj

  Noun - låhkåmuj: # VIESSOMUJ
    låhkåmuj+N+Sg+Nom: låhkåmuj 
    låhkåmuj+N+Sg+Gen: låhkåmuhá
    låhkåmuj+N+Sg+Ill: låhkåmuháj

  Noun - narvijkak: # VUONAK
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkak 
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Gen: narvijkaga
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: narvijkagimme
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Acc: narvijkagav
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ine: narvijkagin 
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ill: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Ela: narvijkagis
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Com: narvijkagijn
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Nom: narvijkaga
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Gen: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Acc: narvijkagijt
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ine: narvijkagijn
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ill: narvijkagijda
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Ela: narvijkagijs
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Pl+Com: narvijkagij
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Ess: narvijkagin
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkagasj
    Narvijkka+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: narvijkagattjasj

  Noun - sjievnnjisvuohta: # VUOHTA
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjisvuohta 
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Gen: sjievnnjisvuoda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: sjievnnjisvuodama
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Acc: sjievnnjisvuodav
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ine: sjievnnjisvuodan
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ill: sjievnnjisvuohtaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Ela: sjievnnjisvuodas
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Com: sjievnnjisvuodajn
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Nom: sjievnnjisvuoda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Gen: sjievnnjisvuodaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Acc: sjievnnjisvuodajt
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ine: sjievnnjisvuodajn
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ill: sjievnnjisvuodajda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: sjievnnjisvuodajdiseda
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Ela: sjievnnjisvuodajs
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Pl+Com: sjievnnjisvuodaj
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Ess: sjievnnjisvuohtan
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Noun - guopsagasj: # BEDNAGASJ
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Nom: guopsagasj 
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: guopsagattjam
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Gen: guopsagattja
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guopsagattjama
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Acc: guopsagattjav
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Ine: guopsagattjan 
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Ill: guopsagattjaj
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Ela: guopsagattjas
    guopsagasj+N+Sg+Com: guopsagattjajn
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Nom: guopsagattja
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Gen: guopsagattjaj
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Acc: guopsagattjajt
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Ine: guopsagattjajn
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Ill: guopsagattjajda
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: guopsagattjajdiseda
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Ela: guopsagattjajs
    guopsagasj+N+Pl+Com: guopsagattjaj
    guopsagasj+N+Ess: guopsagattjan
    guopsagasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guopsagattjasj
    guopsagasj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    guopsagasj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guopsagasj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guopsagasj+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    guopsagasj+N+Abe: []
